Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1670
Juror; serve; limitations.

In any five-year period no person shall be required to:

(1) Serve as a petit juror for more than four calendar weeks, except if necessary to complete service in a particular case;

(2) Serve on more than one grand jury; or

(3) Serve as both a grand and petit juror.

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 16;

Laws 1980, LB 733, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1639;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 27.